New Jersey, session 222, S2736.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a.     As used in this section: Basic life support means a basic level of pre-hospital care which includes patient stabilization, airway clearance, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, hemorrhage control, initial wound care and fracture stabilization and other techniques and procedures authorized by the Department of Health. Emergency medical technician means a person trained in basic life support services as defined in section 1 of P.L.1985, c.351 (C.26:2K-21) and who is certified by the Department of Health to perform these services. Volunteer first aid, rescue and ambulance squad shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1987, c.284 (C.27:5F-20). b.   Each basic life support ambulance and each volunteer first aid, rescue and ambulance squad vehicle shall be equipped with a supply of epinephrine auto-injector devices, and shall be staffed by at least one emergency medical technician certified to administer an epinephrine auto-injector device.  The provisions of this subsection shall neither supersede nor affect the application or interpretation of any federal or State guidance, law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary regarding ambulance staffing levels. 2.    The Commissioner of Health may promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.